Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 67, subdivision 3, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 53, section 10, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Evaluation and report. (a) The Metropolitan Center for Independent Living must contract with a third party to evaluate the pilot project's impact on health care costs, retention of personal care assistants, and patients' and providers' satisfaction of care. The evaluation must include the number of participants, the hours of care provided by participants, and the retention of participants from semester to semester. (b) By January 15, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end , the Metropolitan Center for Independent Living must report the findings under paragraph (a) to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services finance and policy. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 9, section 2, subdivision 5, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 53, section 12, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Central Office; Aging and Disability Services 40,115,000 11,995,000 (a) Employment Supports Alignment Study. $50,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2025 are to conduct an interagency employment supports alignment study. The base for this appropriation is $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027. (b) Case Management Training Curriculum. $377,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $377,000 in fiscal year 2025 are to develop and implement a curriculum and training plan to ensure all lead agency assessors and case managers have the knowledge and skills necessary to fulfill support planning and coordination responsibilities for individuals who use home and community-based disability services and live in own-home settings. This is a onetime appropriation. (c) Office of Ombudsperson for Long-Term Care. $875,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $875,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for additional staff and associated direct costs in the Office of Ombudsperson for Long-Term Care. (d) Direct Care Services Corps Pilot Project. $500,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for a grant to the Metropolitan Center for Independent Living for the direct care services corps pilot project. Up to $25,000 may be used by the Metropolitan Center for Independent Living for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end . (e) Research on Access to Long-Term Care Services and Financing. Any unexpended amount of the fiscal year 2023 appropriation referenced in Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 7, article 17, section 16, estimated to be $300,000, is canceled. The amount canceled is appropriated in fiscal year 2024 for the same purpose. (f) Native American Elder Coordinator. $441,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $441,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for the Native American elder coordinator position under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.975, subdivision 6. (g) Grant Administration Carryforward. (1) Of this amount, $8,154,000 in fiscal year 2024 is available until June 30, 2027. (2) Of this amount, $1,071,000 in fiscal year 2025 is available until June 30, 2027. (3) Of this amount, $19,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is available until June 30, 2029. (h) Base Level Adjustment. The general fund base is increased by $8,189,000 in fiscal year 2026 and increased by $8,093,000 in fiscal year 2027. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end